Utah statutes.
76-5-310.   Aggravated human trafficking and aggravated human smuggling --
Penalties.
(1)  An actor commits aggravated human trafficking for forced labor or forced
sexual exploitation or aggravated human smuggling if, in the course of
committing a human trafficking or human smuggling offense under Section
76-5-309, the offense:
(a)  results in the death of the trafficked or smuggled person;
(b)  results in serious bodily injury of the trafficked or smuggled person;
(c)  involves:
(i)  rape under Section 76-5-402;
(ii)  rape of a child under Section 76-5-402.1;
(iii)  object rape under Section 76-5-402.2;
(iv)  object rape of a child under Section 76-5-402.3;
(v)  forcible sodomy under Section 76-5-403;
(vi)  sodomy on a child under Section 76-5-403.1;
(vii)  aggravated sexual abuse of a child under Section 76-5-404.1; or
(viii)  aggravated sexual assault under 76-5-405;
(d)  involves more than 10 victims in a single episode of human trafficking or
human smuggling; or
(e)  involves a victim who is held against the victim's will for longer than
180 consecutive days.
(2)  An actor commits aggravated human trafficking for forced labor or forced
sexual exploitation if the offense involves a victim who is younger than 18
years of age at the time of the commission of the offense of trafficking.
(3)  An actor commits aggravated human smuggling if the actor commits human
smuggling under Subsection 76-5-309(2) and any human being whom the person
engages in smuggling is:
(a)  younger than 18 years of age; and
(b)  not accompanied by a family member who is 18 years of age or older.
(4) (a)  Aggravated human trafficking for forced labor or forced sexual
exploitation and aggravated human smuggling for profit or commercial purposes
are each a first degree felony.
(b)  Aggravated human trafficking and aggravated human smuggling are each a
separate offense from any other crime committed in relationship to the
commission of either of these offenses.
